Maine, session 132, LD2011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4347, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 469, §8 and affected
by §9, is amended to read:
3. Carrier. "Carrier" has the same meaning as in section 4301‑A, subsection 3, except
that "carrier" does not include a multiple-employer welfare arrangement, as defined in
section 6601, subsection 5, if the multiple-employer welfare arrangement contracts with a
3rd-party administrator to manage and administer health benefits, including benefits for
prescription drugs. "Carrier" also includes the MaineCare program pursuant to Title 22,
chapter 855 and the group health plan provided to state employees and other eligible
persons pursuant to Title 5, section 285.
Page 1 - 132LR2802(02)